North Carolina, session 2025, HB447.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Kernersville for
the Kernersville Event Center.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H447-v-1*